Wyoming, session 2025, SF0021.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-3-110(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xliv) is amended to read:

21-3-110. Duties of boards of trustees.

(a) The board of trustees in each school district
shall:
SF0021

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0273

(xliv) Adopt policies to prohibit students from
using cellular telephones and smart watches during
instructional time. For purposes of this paragraph, "smart
watch" means a wearable computing device that closely
resembles a wristwatch or other time keeping device with
the capacity to act in place of or as an extension of a
person's cellular telephone. "Smart watch" does not include
a wearable device that can only tell time, monitor a
person's health information or track a person's location.
Policies adopted under this paragraph shall not prohibit
students from using cellular telephones and smart watches
under any of the following circumstances:

(A) In the case of an emergency or in
response to a perceived threat of danger;

(B) When an employee of the school district
authorizes a student to use a cellular telephone or a smart
watch;

(C) When using a cellular telephone or a
smart watch is included in a student's individualized
SF0021

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0273
education plan or plan developed under section 504 of the
Federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended;

(D) When a health care provider determines
that the use of a cellular telephone or a smart watch is
necessary to manage a student's health care.

Section 2. Not later than July 1, 2025, each school
district board of trustees shall establish policies in
accordance with this act.

Section 3.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
SF0021